Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Human Service Transportation Delivery

281.870.
Coordinated Transportation Advisory Committee.

There is hereby created a Coordinated Transportation Advisory Committee, also known as the “CTAC”, that is to be composed of designated members of the cabinet, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Education and Labor Cabinet.

Members of the CTAC shall serve terms as determined by each respective cabinet. The CTAC shall meet at least once a month, but may meet more frequently if desired, and shall maintain a written record of all meetings and actions taken. In all proceedings of the CTAC and in all actions taken by the CTAC, the cabinet and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall each have two (2) votes, and the Education and Labor Cabinet shall have one (1) vote. A quorum of the CTAC shall be required to conduct any official business.

The staff of the cabinet’s Office of Transportation Delivery shall provide administrative support to the CTAC. The executive director of the Office of Transportation Delivery shall set the agenda for meetings of the CTAC. The Office of Transportation Delivery may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A governing the human service transportation delivery program on behalf of the CTAC. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to specify the duties and responsibilities of the CTAC.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 63, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 127, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 65, effective June 25, 2009; 2022 ch. 236, § 107, effective July 1, 2022.

281.872.
Program coordinators’ duties relating to eligibility for participation in human service transportation delivery program — Resolution of complaints — Penalties.

The cabinet shall employ a pool of program coordinators. Each program coordinator shall be a state employee and reside in the cabinet.

The program coordinator shall initially investigate all complaints regarding recipients, subcontractors, and the broker for the area and attempt to immediately resolve the problem. All complaints relating to Medicaid fraud or abuse shall be forwarded by the cabinet to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The program coordinator shall further be responsible for assisting a person with a complaint as required in subsection (4) of this section.

The program coordinator shall investigate issues of eligibility that result in a person being denied transportation, determine the status of the person’s case, and attempt to immediately resolve the matter in order for the person to continue to receive transportation services. A broker shall not deny any person transportation services until the program coordinator resolves the question of the person’s eligibility and verifies to the broker that the person is actually ineligible to receive transportation services. A broker who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be subject to his or her contract being revoked by the cabinet. The program coordinator shall coordinate information about eligibility to participate in the human service transportation delivery program between the cabinet, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Education and Labor Cabinet. The cabinet shall ensure each program coordinator has direct computer access to all relevant databases used by all state agencies to administer the human service transportation delivery program. The Department for Medicaid Services shall provide each program coordinator with a monthly eligibility list for the area.

If a program coordinator is unable to resolve a complaint against a broker or subcontractor to the satisfaction of the person lodging the complaint on the same business day the complaint is made, the program coordinator shall immediately act to assist the person in contacting the appropriate state agency to resolve the complaint. The program coordinator shall ensure that the cabinet, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Education and Labor Cabinet strictly adhere to the provisions of 42 C.F.R. governing a person’s right to appeal the denial of service or failure for a complaint to be acted upon promptly. The cabinet shall be required to inform in writing, every person who has either been denied transportation or who has failed to have a complaint resolved in a prompt manner under the human service transportation delivery program, of their right to a hearing to be held in the county where the person lives, and the process to follow to obtain a hearing.

All brokers and subcontractors shall be prohibited from retaliating or attempting retribution in any way against any person using the human service transportation delivery program who files a complaint. A broker or subcontractor who is determined by the cabinet to have violated the provisions of this subsection, after an investigation and hearing conducted by the cabinet, shall have his or her contract revoked by the cabinet within ninety (90) days of the hearing and shall be prohibited from participating in the human service transportation delivery program for five (5) years from the date of the cabinet’s determination.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 64, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 128, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 66, effective June 25, 2009; 2022 ch. 236, § 108, effective July 1, 2022.

281.873.
Definitions for this section and KRS 281.874 — Determination of participants’ eligibility for special carriers transport — Escort or assistance for person receiving transportation delivery services.

As used in this section and KRS

281.874

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Certificate Type 01” means a private automobile;

“Certificate Type 02” means a taxicab or similar for-profit motor carrier vehicle;

“Certificate Type 03” means a bus service;

“Certificate Type 04” means a nonprofit transit system;

“Certificate Type 07” means a specialty carrier certified to transport nonemergency, ambulatory disoriented persons;

“Certificate Type 08” means a specialty carrier, using ramp or lift-equipped vehicles in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, certified to transport nonemergency, nonambulatory persons;

“Level of eligibility” means the specialty transport classification a person is designated based upon the written recommendation of the person’s personal physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or qualified mental health professional that is used to establish the type of specialty transport needed for the person; and

“Qualified mental health professional” shall have the same meaning as in KRS

202A.011

.

Except for members of the general public, the level of eligibility shall dictate both the necessity and the type of special carrier transport for a person participating in the human service transportation delivery program and shall ensure the person shall be transported in the appropriate vehicle designed to accommodate the person’s level of eligibility. The broker shall, upon request by a recipient, provide specialty carrier transportation for a period up to thirty (30) days without written recommendation of the recipient’s personal physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or qualified mental health professional. A broker shall be prohibited from changing or altering a person’s level of eligibility and the accompanying certificate type. A broker shall report questionable specialty classifications to the cabinet.

A parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian shall accompany any minor under the age of thirteen (13) who is receiving human service transportation delivery program services. A parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian may accompany a minor between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen (17) who is receiving human service transportation delivery program services.

An escort shall not be required for any person aged thirteen (13) or older, unless the person’s physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or qualified mental health professional has recommended that the person be transported with an escort based upon one (1) of the following criteria:

A history of a behavior that has resulted in harm to the person or to others while receiving human service transportation delivery program services;

A medical history of a behavior that indicates that the person may be a danger to himself or herself or others; or

Information that the person may become violent in a transportation setting from the person’s support coordinator, who is providing services under 907 KAR 1:145 or any other Medicaid program, and also from the person’s parent or guardian.

A requirement for an escort under subsection (4) of this section shall be removed upon the recommendation of the physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or qualified mental health professional.

If an escort is required under subsection (4) of this section, the transportation provider shall provide one (1) escort per vehicle to pick up each individual at his or her designated location, remain with the person during transport, and escort the person to the designated health care provider or other covered service.

If a person receiving transportation delivery services under a Certificate Type 07 or 08 is not required to have an escort under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, but needs assistance to and from the transportation vehicle, the transportation provider shall provide that service if the following conditions exist:

It would take less than five (5) minutes to accompany the person to and from the transportation vehicle; and

The transportation provider can maintain visual contact with his or her vehicle if there are other persons receiving transportation delivery services remaining in the vehicle.

Any transportation provider that leaves a vehicle to accompany a person to or from the transportation vehicle shall:

Turn off the vehicle engine and retain the key in his or her possession; or

Enable a transmission locking device that prohibits unauthorized use of the vehicle and retain the key in his or her possession.

If a person receiving human service transportation services does not require an escort under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, but needs assistance to and from the vehicle, the transportation provider shall provide one (1) escort per vehicle if the conditions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (7) of this section do not exist.

If a state agency has been appointed as the guardian of a person receiving human service transportation program services, the state shall ensure that the transportation provider provides an escort when the person meets the criteria under subsection (4) of this section.

A parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian accompanying a minor shall not be charged a fare.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 86, § 1, effective March 18, 2003; 2010, ch. 85, § 44, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 19, § 31, effective June 24, 2015.

281.874.
Freedom of choice for participants in human service delivery program — Duties of broker.

Persons participating in the human service transportation delivery program that have a level of eligibility that dictates they be transported under a Certificate Type 07 or 08 shall be ensured the freedom of personal choice in selecting either an eligible subcontractor within the delivery area, or the broker for the area if the broker also provides transportation services, to provide the person’s transportation services.

A person expressing a personal preference under subsection (1) of this section shall contact the broker to arrange transportation services, even if the person is requesting an eligible subcontractor to provide the service. If a person does not express a preference for whom that person wishes to transport the person under subsection (1) of this section, the broker shall determine the eligible subcontractor to provide the service. The broker may select himself or herself if the broker also provides transportation services, however, the broker shall establish a system that fairly and equitably distributes requests for transportation services in the delivery area among the broker and all subcontractors certified to transport Certificate Type 07 or Certificate Type 08.

All brokers shall consider their ability to allow persons with an eligibility level that dictates they be transported under a Certificate Type 02 to request the freedom of personal choice in the selection of who will provide the person’s transportation services. A broker may offer freedom of choice to persons with a Certificate Type 02.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.

281.875.
Administrative regulations governing human service transportation delivery program — Requirement for documentation — Preferential treatment by cabinet prohibited — Handbook.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations governing, but not limited to, the following provisions of the human service transportation delivery program:

Establishment of one (1) or more specific delivery areas;

The length of the term of the contract to be signed with a broker and the criteria to be used to terminate a contract;

Contractual matters to be specified in a request for proposals from brokers including, but not limited to:

Establishment and maintenance of a central business office within the delivery area;

Staffing requirements for the central business office;

Collection and retention of records to be maintained by each broker and subcontractor;

Collection and retention of encounter data on each trip made by the broker if the broker provides transportation services and by each subcontractor. Failure of a broker to record all data required by the cabinet for all trips the broker provided under the human service transportation delivery program shall be grounds for the cabinet to terminate the broker’s contract;

Reporting of all traffic accidents and moving violations involving either a broker or subcontractor; and

Submission of annual financial reports by each broker;

Criteria for evaluating and selecting a broker subject to the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section;

Identification of all federal statutes, federal rules, and federal administrative regulations with which state agencies, brokers, and subcontractors must comply;

Uniform criteria for establishing capitated rates, fees, and reimbursement procedures for all delivery areas, including a mandate that brokers shall have all reports necessary for payment to the cabinet not later than the seventh of each month. The mandate shall also include a requirement that the cabinet shall pay brokers not later than the fifteenth of each month if the broker has submitted all required reports. A broker shall promptly reimburse subcontractors within three (3) business days of payment by the cabinet;

Uniform responsibilities for all brokers and subcontractors including provisions for reservations and trip assignments, quality assurance, administrative oversight, and reporting;

Uniform criteria for contractual agreements between subcontractors and brokers in all delivery areas;

Uniform criteria governing the authorized provision of transportation services offered by brokers in all delivery areas;

Uniform guidelines brokers shall be required to adopt to educate persons in the delivery area regarding:

Procedures for scheduling transportation services including the broker’s normal hours of operation and how to schedule transportation after normal hours of operation, including Sundays and all holidays;

Rates for services;

Information the person shall be required to provide the broker when requesting transportation;

Types of eligible transportation, including pick-up and delivery standards and reasons service may be denied;

Permissibility of escorts and attendants;

Procedures governing requests for urgent care;

Standards for driver conduct;

Standards for passenger conduct; and

Oral and written instructions governing the complaint process and how to lodge a complaint against a subcontractor or broker;

Vehicle requirements governing all vehicles operated by brokers or subcontractors to transport persons under the human service transportation delivery program;

Driver qualifications including driver, attendant, and service personnel training;

Minimum standards to be included in a mandatory orientation program provided by the broker for all subcontractors in the delivery area;

Minimum standards governing volunteer and public transportation services;

Minimum standards governing an operational procedures manual to be developed by all brokers;

Minimum standards governing a quality assurance plan to be developed by all brokers;

Performance monitoring by the cabinet of brokers and subcontractors; and

Standards governing uniform software that all brokers shall be required to use to ensure the uniform collection of data and to facilitate the production and analysis of uniform reports relating to the human service transportation delivery system.

A person that submits a request for proposal to be a broker under the human service transportation delivery program shall be required to submit documentation that he or she has at least one (1) year experience working with persons with special needs.

The cabinet shall be prohibited from awarding higher scores, or giving any type of preferential treatment to, any person that submits a request for proposal to be a broker who is also a transportation provider over a person who submits a request to be a broker but who is not a transportation provider.

The cabinet shall develop a handbook specifying standard operating procedures, which shall be distributed to all providers and shall be made available to the general public.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2000). Under 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 346, sec. 16, subsection (4) of this statute takes effect March 1, 2001.

281.876.
Waiving of notice requirement with physician verification.

The cabinet shall require and shall ensure that all brokers shall permit a person to request and receive human service transportation with less than the time notice established by administrative regulation for scheduling transportation services if the person’s physician submits verification to the broker that the person needs to be seen by the physician or another physician to whom the person is being referred for medical treatment. A broker who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be subject to his or her contract being revoked by the cabinet.

The physician verification required under subsection (1) of this section may be transmitted in any of the following methods:

Oral verification over the telephone;

Written verification transmitted electronically by computer or by facsimile; or

Written verification delivered by the person directly to the broker or subcontractor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

281.877.
Coordination of human service transportation delivery program with general public transportation.

A broker may coordinate the human service transportation delivery program with general public transportation as provided in this chapter and KRS Chapter 96A.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 10, effective July 14, 2000.

281.878.
Prohibition against imposition of requirements not provided by law.

A broker shall be prohibited from imposing any requirement on any subcontractor that is not provided for in this chapter, or in an administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of the human service transportation delivery program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 11, effective July 14, 2000.

281.879.
Penalties for violation of statutes relating to human service transportation delivery.

A broker or subcontractor who is determined by the cabinet to have violated the provisions of KRS

281.872

,

281.873

,

281.874

,

281.875

,

281.876

, or

281.878

, after an investigation and hearing conducted by the cabinet, shall have his or her contract revoked by the cabinet within ninety (90) days of the hearing and shall be prohibited from participating in the human service transportation delivery program for five (5) years from the date of the cabinet’s determination.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 346, § 9, effective July 14, 2000.